Hawaii statutes.
§425-3 Foreign partnerships, powers and
liabilities. A partnership formed under the laws of any other
jurisdiction, shall, on filing a registration statement as required by section
425-1 and subject to continuing compliance with the other provisions of this
part, have the same powers and privileges, and be subject to the same
disabilities as are by law conferred upon partnerships formed under the laws of
the State, provided always that the purposes for which the partnership is
formed are not repugnant to or in conflict with any law of the State. [L 1969,
c 247, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next